Utah statutes.
70A-7a-103.   Relation of chapter to treaty or statute.
(1)  This chapter is subject to any treaty or statute of the United States or
regulatory statute of this state to the extent the treaty, statute, or
regulatory statute is applicable.
(2)  This chapter does not modify or repeal any law prescribing the form or
content of a document of title or the services or facilities to be afforded by
a bailee, or otherwise regulating a bailee's business in respects not
specifically treated in this chapter.  However, violation of such a law does
not affect the status of a document of title that otherwise is within the
definition of a document of title.
(3)  This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et
seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15
U.S.C. Section 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b)).
(4)  To the extent there is a conflict between Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform
Electronic Transactions Act, and this chapter, this chapter governs.
